hu_hu.dict
összehantál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
írat/ŠĽŁOoŤX)
ás/ŠĽŁOoŤX	
árasztat/ŠĽŁOoŤX
állogat/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX
ácsol/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
zár/ŠĽŁOoŤX	
zsurmol/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
zsaluz/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
zabáltat/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX
vázol/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
váltat/ŠĽŁOoŤX
vágat/ŠĽŁOoŤX)
vonatkozik/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
visít/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX
virtualizál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
villamosít/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX
viaszoz/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
varrat/ŠĽŁOoŤX
vakar/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX
utánnyomat/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX
undorít/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX
túrat/ŠĽŁOoŤX
távozik/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
tárcsáz/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
tájékoztat/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX
tupíroz/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
trógerol/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
trancsíroz/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
torkol/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
tolat/ŠĽŁOoŤX)
titkosít/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX
tilol/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
taszít/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX
tarisznyáz/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
tapasztat/ŠĽŁOoŤX
találkozik/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
taglóz/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
sózat/ŠĽŁOoŤX)
sároz/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
szótagol/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
szívat/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX
szántogat/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX
szállít/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX
szusszantat/ŠĽŁOoŤX
sztorníroz/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
szopat/ŠĽŁOoŤX
szobrászkodik/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX
szipkáz/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
sziesztázik/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
szekvenál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
szarik/ŠĽŁOoŤX=
szalajtat/ŠĽŁOoŤX)
szajkóz/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
szabadságol/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
suhintat/ŠĽŁOoŤX)
strázsál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
spórol/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
sorsol/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
sodor/ĽŁĄOoŤd'X	
sipít/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX
sikoltat/ŠĽŁOoŤX
sarkall/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
rúgtat/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX
rántat/ŠĽŁOoŤX
rágalmaz/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
rovatol/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
rop/ŠĽŁOoŤX	
rohamoz/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
riposztoz/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
riasztat/ŠĽŁOoŤX
reprodukál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
rektifikál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
recitál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
rakat/ŠĽŁOoŤX)
ragad/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX	
pátyolgat/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX
párnáz/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
puszil/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
pufog/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX
provideál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
problémázik/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
pottyantat/ŠĽŁOoŤX)
porol/§ĽŁĄXOoŤd')	
politúroz/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
poentíroz/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
pityizál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
pipál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
permutál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
pattogtat/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX
passzol/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
parancsolgat/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX
palántál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
pacifikál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
orrontat/ŠĽŁOoŤX)
ontat/ŠĽŁOoŤX
oltat/ŠĽŁOoŤX
okoz/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
nádal/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
nyálzik/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX
nyomozgat/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX
nyom/ŠĽŁOoŤX	
nyilaz/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
nyalat/ŠĽŁOoŤX)
nekidurál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
nagyoll/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
mészárol/§ĽŁĄOoŤd'X	
mártogat/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX
mutogat/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX
motyog/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX
mormol/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
modifikál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
militarizál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
mattol/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
markecol/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
manifesztál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
magyarázgat/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX
lúgoz/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
lázít/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX
lukaszt/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
lomtalanít/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX
lobbant/Š§ĽŁOoŤX	
lerohad/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX
lecsillapszik/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX
lapszámoz/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
lakik/ŠĽŁOoŤX
kúpol/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
kólint/Š§ĽŁOoŤX	
káromkodik/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX
kurvul/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
kunyerál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
krétáz/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
kottyantat/ŠĽŁOoŤX
kortyol/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
korhol/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
kopogtat/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX
kontíroz/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
konfrontál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
kompromittál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
kolportál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
koccintat/ŠĽŁOoŤX)
klasszicizál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
kiakolbólít/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX
kategorizál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
karol/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
karatézik/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
kaparint/Š§ĽŁOoŤX	
kampányol/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
kakecol/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
jósol/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
jutalmaz/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
jajgat/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX
iszogat/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX
irkál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
internalizál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
inicializál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
indexál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
illatosít/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX
idomtalanít/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX
hódít/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX
hápog/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX
hájaz/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
hunyat/ŠĽŁOoŤX
hozat/ŠĽŁOoŤX
horgasztat/ŠĽŁOoŤX
hizlal/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
hibridizál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
hazardírozik/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
hasznosít/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX
haragít/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX
hamvasztat/ŠĽŁOoŤX
hallat/ŠĽŁOoŤX)
hajolgat/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX
hadar/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX
gépírat/ŠĽŁOoŤX
gyújtat/ŠĽŁOoŤX
gyorsít/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX
gyaláz/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
gubancol/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
golyóz/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
gazdagít/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX
gagyarász/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX
fölbolydul/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
fájat/ŠĽŁOoŤX)
furkál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
fricskáz/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
foszladozik/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
formalizál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
fonat/ŠĽŁOoŤX
fojt/ŠĽŁOoŤX	
foganatosít/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX
firkálgat/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX
figuráz/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
faxozik/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
fanatizál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
fagyizik/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
exponál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
epilál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
ejakulál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
dúcol/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
duggat/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX
dobozol/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
diagonál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
demokratizál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
dauerol/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
cukkol/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
csábítgat/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX
csiszolgat/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX
csatázik/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
cirókál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
bújik/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX
bágyasztat/ŠĽŁOoŤX)
buggyantat/ŠĽŁOoŤX)
borjadzik/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
bodroz/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
bikáz/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
barbarizál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
arénázik/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
andalít/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX
alkalmaz/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
akadályoz/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
adat/ŠĽŁOoŤX)
